Massachusetts, session 194th, S656.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 21E of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting, after Section 22, the following new section:-
Section 23. (a) As used in this chapter the following words shall, unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:-
“Approved Re-use”, the use of soil for the reclamation of a quarry, sand pit or gravel pit
under the conditions of this policy;
of 6

“Covered project”, any quarry, gravel pit, or sand pit reclamation project that receives, or
plans to receive, greater than 100,000 cubic yards of soil for the reclamation or filling of said
quarry, gravel pit, or sand pit.
“Filling operation”, the filling of sand pits, gravel pits, and quarries.
"Department'', the department of environmental protection.
"Hazardous material'', material including but not limited to, any material, in whatever
form, which, because of its quantity, concentration, chemical, corrosive, flammable, reactive,
toxic, infectious or radioactive characteristics, either separately or in combination with any
substance or substances, constitutes a present or potential threat to human health, safety, welfare,
or to the environment, when improperly stored, treated, transported, disposed of, used, or
otherwise managed. The term shall not include oil. The term shall also include all those
substances which are included under 42 USC Sec. 9601(14), but it is not limited to those
substances.
“Reportable release”, the release of oil or hazardous material into the environment which
requires notice pursuant to 310 CMR 40.000.
“Notification Requirements”, means the requirements for providing notification to the
Department:
(i) of releases, and threats of release, of oil and/or hazardous material and Imminent
Hazards set forth in 310 CMR 40.0300; and/or
(ii) of changes in activities, uses and/or exposures set forth in 310 CMR 40.0020.
of 6

"Oil'', insoluble or partially soluble oils of any kind or origin or in any form, including,
without limitation, crude or fuel oils, lube oil or sludge, asphalt, insoluble or partially insoluble
derivatives of mineral, animal or vegetable oils. The term shall not include waste oil, and shall
not include those substances which are included in 42 USC Sec. 9601(14).
“Release”, the placement, dumping, disposing or reuse of soil containing oil or hazardous
material into the environment, as the term is defined in section 2 of chapter 21E and pursuant to
310 CMR 40.000.
“Solid waste” or “waste”, means useless, unwanted or discarded solid, liquid or contained
gaseous material resulting from industrial, commercial, mining, agricultural, municipal or
household activities that is disposed or is stored, treated, processed or transferred pending such
disposal, but does not include:
(i) hazardous wastes as defined and regulated pursuant to 310 CMR 30.000;
(ii) sludge or septage which is land applied in compliance with 310 CMR 32.00;
(iii) waste-water treatment facility residuals and sludge ash from either publicly or
privately owned waste-water treatment facilities that treat only sewage and which is treated or
disposed at a site regulated pursuant to sections 6 and 7 of chapter 83 or pursuant to sections 26
through 53 of chapter 21, unless the waste-water treatment residuals and/or sludge ash are co-
disposed with solid waste;
(iv) septage and sewage as defined and regulated pursuant to sections 26 through 53 of
chapter 21
of 6

(v) ash produced from the combustion of coal when reused as prescribed pursuant to
Section 150A of chapter 111;
(vi) solid or dissolved materials in irrigation return flows;
(vii) source, special nuclear or by-product material as defined by the Atomic Energy Act
of 1954;
(viii) materials and by-products generated from and reused within an original
manufacturing process;
(ix) materials which are recycled, composted, or converted in compliance with 310 CMR
16.03, 16.04 or 16.05; and
(x) organic material when handled at a Publicly Owned Treatment Works as defined in
314 CMR 12.00 and as approved by the Department pursuant to 314 CMR 12.00.
(b) This act shall apply to any quarry, gravel pit, or sand pit reclamation project that
receives, or plans to receive, greater than 100,000 cubic yards of soil for the reclamation or
filling of said quarry, gravel pit, or sand pit.
(c) The department shall issue a site-specific approval, in the form of an administrative
consent order, to any filling operation that is a covered project.
The administrative consent order shall include the following: (1) implementation of a
detailed soil and fill management plan that specifies how material will be sampled, documented,
tracked, transported and managed as well as what materials are permitted and not permitted; (2)
detailed plans that specify how material will be managed at the reclamation project to prevent
nuisance conditions, such as noise, odor, litter, and dust; (3) a detailed stormwater management
of 6

plan to prevent impacts to sensitive receptors; (4) detailed wetlands impact provisions, including,
as applicable, a requirement to obtain an order of conditions, determination of applicability or
other approval or permit to proceed with the project as designed; (5) a plan for communicating
with the public and involving interested parties at key points in the implementation of the
reclamation project; (6) oversight by a qualified environmental professional and third party
inspection program; (7) knowledge of and intention to comply with all applicable laws and
regulations; and (8) stipulated penalties for noncompliance with the administrative consent order;
(9) certification, signed by an agent of the covered project, that the reuse of large volumes of soil
pose no significant risk of harm to health, safety, public welfare, or the environment and would
not create new releases or threats of releases of oil or hazardous materials.
(d) To be eligible for department approval, soil accepted by a covered project for use in a
filling operation shall not contain more than de minimus quantities of solid waste. The
placement, dumping, disposing or reuse of soil containing oil or hazardous material into the
environment shall constitute a release. Such dumping, disposing, or unapproved re-use of soil is
a reportable release requiring assessment and remediation.
(e) Filling operations conducted without the approval of the department shall be subject
to department enforcement for violations of rules governing solid waste management and oil or
hazardous material release pursuant to department regulations.
(f) A covered project that is not managed in compliance with the requirements of this act
shall be found to have caused, contributed to, or exacerbated a release of oil or hazardous
material and shall be subject to enforcement pursuant to section 277 of chapter 165 of the acts of
2014 and chapter 21E of the general laws. Any fill project that accepts any amount of soil,
of 6

whether pursuant to this act or otherwise, must ensure that the filling does not create new,
reportable releases of oil or hazardous materials to the environment pursuant to chapter 21E or
will not violate section 150A of chapter 111.
(d) Nothing in this act shall eliminate any local, state, or federal requirements that apply
to the management of soil, including any local, state, or federal permits or approvals necessary
before placing the soil at the receiving location, including, but not limited to, those related to
placement of fill, noise, traffic, dust control, stormwater management, wetlands, groundwater or
drinking source protection.
of 6